Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1222
Purchase of microfilm system or equipment;
approval; property of administrator.

No state agency shall purchase
any microfilm system or equipment prior to the approval of the administrator. The administrator
shall not approve internal microfilm activities of any state agency unless
such activities may not be feasibly provided by the central microfilming agency
and are necessary to a particular operation within the state agency. Any equipment
purchased under this section shall become the property of the administrator.

Laws 1977, LB 520, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB71901, § 27.
July 19, 2012